Hawaii statutes.
[§431:19-210] Disposition of assets;
investments. (a) The assets of a special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall be preserved and administered by or on behalf of the
special purpose financial captive insurance company to satisfy the liabilities
and obligations of the special purpose financial captive insurance company, the
insurance securitization, and other related contracts and agreements.

(b) Unless waived by the commissioner, any
security offering memorandum or other document issued to prospective investors
regarding the offer and sale of a surplus note or other special purpose
financial captive insurance company securities shall include a disclosure that
all or part of the proceeds of the insurance securitization will be used to fund
the special purpose financial captive insurance company's obligations to the
counterparty.

(c) A special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall not be subject to any restriction on investments;
provided that the special purpose financial captive insurance company:

(1) Maintains compliance with the strategic
investment policy adopted by the special purpose financial captive insurance
company; and

(2) Shall not make a loan to any person other than as
permitted under its plan of operation or as otherwise approved in advance by
the commissioner;

provided further that the commissioner may prohibit
or limit any investment that threatens the solvency or liquidity of the special
purpose financial captive insurance company unless the investment is otherwise
approved in its plan of operation or in an order issued to the special purpose
financial captive insurance company pursuant to section 431:19-202(c). [L 2008,
c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next